District of Columbia statutes.
47-2107

Chapter not applicable to public officials.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to public or court officers, or to any other person or persons acting under the license, direction, or authority of any court, local or federal, selling goods, wares, or merchandise in the course of their official duties.

Sept. 1, 1959, 73 Stat. 451, Pub. L. 86-219, § 7
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2107.
1973 Ed., § 47-3007.